Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Trade Practices in General.

Sec. 21.36.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to regulate an act or a trade practice in the business of insurance in accordance with the intent of Congress as expressed in 15 U.S.C. 1011 — 1015 (McCarran-Ferguson Act) by defining or providing for determination of all the practices in this state that constitute an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice and by prohibiting them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 163 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.36.020.
Unfair methods, deceptive acts prohibited.

A person may not engage in an act or a trade practice in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state that is defined in this chapter as, or determined under this chapter to be, an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 138 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 97 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 8.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Sec. 21.36.025.
Unfair marketing practices prohibited.

A person may not violate the applicable provisions of AS

21.56.180

.

A person may not sell a membership in an association or labor union for the purpose of qualifying an individual for group insurance.

A person that sells a membership in an association may not offer group insurance for purposes of selling membership in an association or labor union.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1993; am § 30 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 21.36.030.
Misrepresentation and false advertising of insurance policies.

A person may not make, issue, circulate, broadcast, or have made, issued, circulated, or broadcast an estimate, circular, statement, illustration, comparison, assertion, or other written, electronic, or oral presentation that

misrepresents the benefits, advantages, conditions, sponsorship, source, or terms of an insurance policy or a health discount plan;

misrepresents the dividends or share of the surplus to be received on an insurance policy;

misrepresents an insurance policy as being a share or shares of stock;

makes a false or misleading statement as to the dividends or shares of the surplus previously paid on an insurance policy;

misrepresents or makes a misleading statement as to the financial condition of an insurer or as to the legal reserve system upon which a life insurer operates;

uses a name or title of an insurance policy or class of insurance policies misrepresenting its true nature;

is a misrepresentation for the purpose of inducing, or that tends to induce the lapse, forfeiture, exchange, conversion, or surrender of an insurance policy;

is a misrepresentation for the purpose of effecting or tending to effect a pledge or assignment of or loan against an insurance policy;

appears to be an actual policy for a named individual when it is merely an advertisement;

does not clearly designate the name of the insurer providing the coverage or about which the statements are made;

is in any other way misleading, false, or deceptive;

misrepresents a health discount plan as a form or type of insurance;

describes a health discount plan using common insurance terminology; or

misrepresents that a health discount plan is underwritten by or associated with an insurer.

In this section, “misrepresentation” includes any statement or omission of a statement that when taken in the context of the whole presentation may tend to mislead or deceive the person or persons addressed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 163 SLA 1976; am §§ 21, 22 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 5.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

For life insurance policy illustrations, see 3 AAC 28, art. 9.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Liability of insurance agent or broker to insured for misrepresentation of cash surrender value or accumulated value benefits of life insurance policy. 44 ALR4th 1030.

Sec. 21.36.035.
Prohibited advertisements and representations. [Repealed, § 46 ch 119 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 21.36.040.
False information, advertising.

A person may not make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over a radio or television station, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an assertion, representation, or statement with respect to the business of insurance or with respect to a person in the conduct of the person’s insurance business, that is untrue, deceptive, or misleading.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Sec. 21.36.045.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.465.]

Sec. 21.36.050.
Twisting prohibited.

A person may not make or issue, or cause to be made or issued, a written or oral statement misrepresenting or making incomplete comparisons as to the terms, conditions, or benefits contained in a policy for the purpose of inducing or attempting or tending to induce the policyholder to lapse, forfeit, surrender, retain, exchange, or convert an insurance policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For annuity contract disclosures, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 7.

For life insurance policy and annuity contract replacements, see 3 AAC 26, art. 8.

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Sec. 21.36.055.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.470.]

Sec. 21.36.060.
False or misleading financial statements.

A person may not knowingly file with a public official, or knowingly make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or deliver to a person, or place before the public, or knowingly cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, delivered to a person, or placed before the public, a false statement of the financial condition of a person in the insurance business.

A person may not make a false entry in a book, report, or statement of a person in the insurance business, knowing it to be a false entry, or knowingly omit to make a true entry of a material fact pertaining to the business of a person in the insurance business in a book, report, or statement.

A person may not, directly or indirectly, in connection with an audit, review, or communication required under AS

21.09.200

,

make or cause to be made a materially false or misleading statement to an accountant; or

omit to state or cause another person to omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make other statements made not misleading to an accountant.

A person may not, directly or indirectly, take any action to coerce, manipulate, mislead, or fraudulently influence any accountant engaged in the performance of an audit under AS

21.09.200

if that person knew or should have known that the action, if successful, could result in rendering the insurer’s financial statement materially misleading.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 163 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 38 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For financial examination of and annual audit reporting requirements for admitted insurers, see 3 AAC 21, art. 7.

Sec. 21.36.065.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.475.]

Sec. 21.36.070.
Defamation.

A person may not make, publish, disseminate, or circulate, directly or indirectly, or aid, abet, or encourage the making, publishing, disseminating, or circulating of an oral or written statement or a pamphlet, circular, article, or literature that is false, or maliciously critical of or derogatory to the financial condition of a person in the insurance business or proposing to enter the insurance business and that is calculated to injure a person engaged or proposing to engage in the business of insurance.

A person providing the director with information concerning the financial condition or an act or a practice of a licensee of the division is immune from liability for defamation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 163 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.36.080.
Boycott, coercion, and intimidation.

A person may not enter into an agreement to commit, or by any concerted action commit, an act of boycott, coercion, or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in unreasonable restraint of, or monopoly in, the business of insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Sec. 21.36.090.
Unfair discrimination.

A person may not make or permit unfair discrimination between individuals of the same class and equal expectation of life in the rates charged for a contract of life insurance or of life annuity or in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any other of the terms and conditions of the contract.

A person may not make or permit unfair discrimination between individuals of the same class and of essentially the same hazard in the amount of premium, policy fees, or rates charged for a policy or contract of health insurance or in the benefits payable, or in any of the terms or conditions of the contract, or in any other manner whatever.

A person may not make or permit arbitrary or unfair discrimination between insureds or property having like insuring or risk characteristics, in the premium or rates charged for a policy or contract of property, casualty, surety, marine, wet marine or transportation insurance, or in the dividends or other benefits payable on the insurance, or in the selection of it, or in any other of the terms and conditions of the insurance.

Except to the extent necessary to comply with AS

21.42.365

and AS 21.56, a person may not practice or permit unfair discrimination against a person who provides a service covered under a group health insurance policy that extends coverage on an expense incurred basis, or under a group service or indemnity type contract issued by a health maintenance organization or a nonprofit corporation, if the service is within the scope of the provider’s occupational license. In this subsection, “provider” means a state licensed physician, physician assistant, dentist, osteopath, optometrist, chiropractor, advanced practice registered nurse, naturopath, physical therapist, occupational therapist, marital and family therapist, psychologist, psychological associate, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional counselor, or certified direct-entry midwife.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 163 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1983; am § 28 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 150 SLA 1988; am § 139 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 39 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1993; am §§ 28, 29 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 17 SLA 2007; am § 35 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For unfair discrimination, see 3 AAC 26, art. 2.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (d), deleted “nurse midwife” following “chiropractor” and substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

Sec. 21.36.093.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.480.]

Sec. 21.36.095.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.485.]

Sec. 21.36.096.
Prohibited denial of claim for causation.

An insurer may not deny a claim if a risk, hazard, or contingency insured against is the dominant cause of a loss and the denial occurs because an excluded risk, hazard, or contingency is also in a chain of causes but operates on a secondary basis.

History.

(§ 7 ch 97 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.212

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.100.
Rebates.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, a person may not knowingly permit or offer to make or make a contract of life insurance, life annuity or health insurance, or agreement under the contract other than as plainly expressed in the contract, or pay, allow, give or offer to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as inducement to the insurance, or annuity, a rebate of premiums payable on the contract, or a special favor or advantage in the dividends or other benefits, or paid employment or contract for services of any kind, or any valuable consideration or inducement whatever not specified in the contract; or directly or indirectly give, sell, purchase or offer to agree to give, sell, purchase, or allow as inducement to the insurance or annuity or in connection therewith, whether or not to be specified in the policy or contract, an agreement of any form or nature promising returns, profits, stocks, bonds, or other securities, or interest present or contingent in the contract or as measured by the contract, of an insurance company or other corporation, association, or partnership, or dividends or profits accrued or to accrue under the contract; or offer, promise, or give anything of value that is not specified in the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 31 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For consumer credit insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 4.

Sec. 21.36.110.
Exceptions to discrimination and rebates.

Nothing in AS

21.36.090

,

21.36.100

, and AS

21.54.100

may be construed as including within the definition of discrimination or rebates any of the following practices:

in the case of a contract of life insurance or life annuity, paying bonuses to policyholders or otherwise abating their premiums in whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from nonparticipating insurance, if the bonuses or abatement of premiums is fair and equitable to policyholders and for the best interests of the insurer;

in the case of a life insurance policy issued on industrial debit, preauthorized check, bank draft, or similar plans, making allowance to policyholders who have made premium payments directly to an office of the insurer or by preauthorized debit, check, bank draft, or similar plan, in an amount that fairly represents the saving in collection expense;

readjustment of the rate of premium for a group insurance policy based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at the end of the first or a subsequent policy year of insurance thereunder, which may be made retroactive only for that policy year;

issuance of life or health insurance policies or annuity contracts at rates less than the usual rates of premiums for the policies or contracts, or modification of premium or rate based on amount of insurance; but the issuance or modification may not result in reduction in premium or rate in excess of savings in administration and issuance expenses reasonably attributable to the policies or contracts;

a reward under a wellness program established under a health care plan that favors an individual if the wellness program meets the following requirements:

the wellness program is reasonably designed to promote health or prevent disease;

an individual has an opportunity to qualify for the reward at least once a year;

the reward is available for all similarly situated individuals;

the wellness program has alternative standards for individuals who are unable to obtain the reward because of a health factor;

alternative standards are available for an individual who is unable to participate in a reward program because of a health condition;

the insurer provides information explaining the standard for achieving the reward and discloses the alternative standards; and

the total rewards for all wellness programs under the health insurance policy do not exceed 20 percent of the cost of coverage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 32 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.36.120.
Unfair discrimination and rebates prohibited in property and casualty insurance.

A property, casualty, or surety insurer or its employee or representative, or an agent, or solicitor may not pay, allow, give, or offer to pay, allow, or give, directly or indirectly, as an inducement to insurance or after insurance has been effected, a rebate, discount, abatement, credit, or reduction of the premium named in the policy of insurance, or a special favor or advantage in the dividends or other benefits to accrue thereon, or any valuable consideration or inducement, not specified in the policy, except to the extent provided for in an applicable filing with the director as provided by law.

An insured named in a policy, or an employee of the insured may not knowingly receive or accept directly or indirectly, a rebate, discount, abatement, credit, or reduction of premium, or special favor or advantage or valuable consideration or inducement.

An insurer may not make or permit an unfair discrimination between insureds or property having like insuring or risk characteristics, in the premium or rates charged for insurance, or in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any other of the terms and conditions of the insurance.

Nothing in this section may be construed as prohibiting the payment of commissions or other compensation to persons duly transacting business under AS 21.27, or as prohibiting an insurer from allowing or returning to its participating policyholders, members, or subscribers, lawful dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 55 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For schedule and individual risk rating plans, see 3 AAC 29, art. 5.

Sec. 21.36.122.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.490.]

Sec. 21.36.125.
Unfair claim settlement practices.

A person may not commit any of the following acts or practices:

misrepresent facts or policy provisions relating to coverage of an insurance policy;

fail to acknowledge and act promptly upon communications regarding a claim arising under an insurance policy;

fail to adopt and implement reasonable standards for prompt investigation of claims;

refuse to pay a claim without a reasonable investigation of all of the available information and an explanation of the basis for denial of the claim or for an offer of compromise settlement;

fail to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a reasonable time of the completion of proof-of-loss statements;

fail to attempt in good faith to make prompt and equitable settlement of claims in which liability is reasonably clear;

engage in a pattern or practice of compelling insureds to litigate for recovery of amounts due under insurance policies by offering substantially less than the amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by those insureds;

compel an insured or third-party claimant in a case in which liability is clear to litigate for recovery of an amount due under an insurance policy by offering an amount that does not have an objectively reasonable basis in law and fact and that has not been documented in the insurer’s file;

attempt to make an unreasonably low settlement by reference to printed advertising matter accompanying or included in an application;

attempt to settle a claim on the basis of an application that has been altered without the consent of the insured;

make a claims payment without including a statement of the coverage under which the payment is made;

make known to an insured or third-party claimant a policy of appealing from an arbitration award in favor of an insured or third-party claimant for the purpose of compelling the insured or third-party claimant to accept a settlement or compromise less than the amount awarded in arbitration;

delay investigation or payment of claims by requiring submission of unnecessary or substantially repetitive claims reports and proof-of-loss forms;

fail to promptly settle claims under one portion of a policy for the purpose of influencing settlements under other portions of the policy;

fail to promptly provide a reasonable explanation of the basis in the insurance policy in relation to the facts or applicable law for denial of a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement; or

offer a form of settlement or pay a judgment in any manner prohibited by AS

21.96.030

;

violate a provision contained in AS 21.07.

The provisions of this section do not create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of this section.

The director of insurance shall adopt regulations to implement, define, and enforce this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 163 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 97 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (a)(17) was enacted as (16).
Renumbered in 2000.

Subsection (c) was formerly AS

21.36.350

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “this section” was substituted for “ AS

21.36.350

”.
Also in 2010, in (a)(16), “ AS

21.96.030

” was substituted for “ AS 21.89.030” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS 21.89.030.

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

For uniform claim forms, see 3 AAC 28, art. 8.

Sec. 21.36.128.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.495.]

Sec. 21.36.130.
Stock operations and advisory board contracts.

A person may not issue or deliver or permit its agents, officers, or employees to issue or deliver, agency company stock or other capital stock, or benefit certificates or shares in a common law corporation, or securities, or an advisory board contract or other similar contract of any kind promising returns and profits as an inducement to insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 163 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.36.140.
Desist orders for prohibited practices. [Repealed, § 11 ch 163 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 21.36.145.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.500.]

Sec. 21.36.150.
[Renumbered as AS 23.36.900.]

Sec. 21.36.155.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.505.]

Sec. 21.36.160.
Right of debtor or borrower to select insurance producer and insurer.

If property insurance is required in connection with a debt or loan, the debtor or borrower has the reasonable right to select the insurance producer and insurer through whom the insurance is to be placed if (1) the insurance is provided for the protection of the creditor’s or lender’s interest in the property at the commencement of the risk; or (2) in the case of renewal of insurance, the renewal policy is delivered to the creditor or lender no later than 30 days before the renewal date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 56 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.36.162.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.510.]

Sec. 21.36.164.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.317.]

Sec. 21.36.165.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.319.]

Sec. 21.36.167.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.321.]

Sec. 21.36.168.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.323.]

Sec. 21.36.169.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.325.]

Sec. 21.36.170.
Interlocking ownership, management.

An insurer may retain, invest in, or acquire the whole or a part of the capital stock of another insurer or insurers, or have a common management with another insurer or insurers, unless the retention, investment, acquisition, or common management is inconsistent with a provision of this title, or unless by reason thereof the business of the insurers with the public is conducted in a manner that substantially lessens competition generally in the insurance business or tends to create a monopoly.

A person otherwise qualified may be director of two or more insurers that are competitors, unless the effect is to lessen substantially competition between insurers generally or tends materially to create a monopoly.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.36.180.
Illegal dealing in premiums. [Repealed, §
22 ch 149 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 21.36.185.
Maintenance of complaint handling records.

Except for records subject to health carrier grievance reporting and record keeping requirements established under AS

21.07.005

, an insurer shall maintain a complete record of all the complaints received by the insurer since the date of the insurer’s last market conduct examination under AS

21.06.120

or for four years, whichever occurs first. This record must indicate the total number of complaints, the classification of each complaint by line of insurance, the nature of each complaint, the disposition of each complaint, and the time it took to process each complaint. For purposes of this section, “complaint” means any written communication primarily expressing a grievance.

History.

(§ 35 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 31 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, substituted “Except for records subject to health carrier grievance reporting and record keeping requirements established under AS

21.07.005

, an” for “An” at the beginning of the first sentence.

Sec. 21.36.190.
Fictitious groups.

An insurer, whether an authorized or unauthorized insurer, may not make available through a rating plan or form, property, casualty, or surety insurance to a firm, corporation, or association of individuals, a preferred rate or premium based upon a fictitious group of the firm, corporation, or association of individuals.

A form or plan of insurance covering a group or combination of persons or risks may not be written or delivered inside or outside this state to cover persons or risks in this state at a preferred rate or on a form other than that offered to persons not in the group or combination and to the public generally, unless the form, plan of insurance, and the rates or premiums to be charged have been submitted to and approved by the director as being not unfairly discriminatory and not otherwise in conflict with (a) of this section or with AS 21.39 to the extent that AS 21.39 is, by its terms, applicable to it.

This section does not apply to mortgage guaranty insurance, life insurance, health insurance, or annuity contracts.

This section does not apply to workers’ compensation insurance when issued to an association of employers formed for purposes other than the purchase of insurance and that

has a constitution and bylaws;

incorporates a safety program;

as a group has preferred characteristics over similar risks written on an individual basis; and

has filed and received approval from the director for the rating program to be applied to the group.

This section does not apply to insurance coverage under a joint insurance arrangement authorized by AS 21.76.

Except as provided in AS

21.36.475

, an insurer, whether authorized or unauthorized, may not underwrite an owner controlled insurance program or contractor controlled insurance program. In this subsection, “owner controlled insurance program” and “contractor controlled insurance program” have the meanings given in AS

21.36.475

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 206 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1986; am § 33 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (f), “AS

21.36.475

” was substituted for “AS

21.36.065

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.065

.

Administrative Code. —

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Sec. 21.36.195.
Surplus lines brokers and insurance producers; prohibited acts.

A surplus lines broker or an insurance producer may not fail to provide evidence of insurance, filings, or reports, or fail to maintain the records, or fail to pay the taxes and fees, required under AS 21.34.

History.

(§ 22 ch 117 SLA 1984; am § 57 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 26 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For surplus lines — unauthorized insurers, see 3 AAC 25.

Sec. 21.36.200.
False applications, claims, proofs of loss. [Repealed, § 22 ch 149 SLA 1984.]